Illinois, session 104th, SB3123.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 5adding Section 2-625 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 5/2-625 new)7    Sec. 2-625. Immunity for engineers and architects for 8emergency response activities. Any licensed engineer or 9licensed architect or other person working under the direct 10supervision of the licensed person who participates in 11emergency response activities under the direction of, or in 12connection with, a community emergency response team, county 13emergency management agency, the State emergency management 14agency, or the Federal Emergency Management Agency is not 15liable for any civil damages because of any acts, services, or 16omissions provided without compensation if the individual acts 17as a reasonably prudent person would have acted under the same 18or similar circumstances. The immunity provided in this 19Section applies to any acts, services, or omissions provided 20within 30 days after declaration of the emergency.